Tennessee, session 114, SB2559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 52-8-203(b), is amended by deleting
"pilot" wherever it appears.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-8-203(b), is amended by deleting
subdivisions (b)(4)(B) and (C).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2559
012410
- 1 -